en: Caramelized pecan nuts
nl: Gekarameliseerde pecannoten

en: Caramelized mixed nuts
es: Mezclas de frutos de cáscara caramelizados, Mezclas de frutos secos caramelizados
fr: Noix mélangées caramélisées
hr: Karameliziranih miješanih orašastih plodova
lt: Karamelizuoti įvairūs riešutai
nl: Gemengde suikernoten

en: Caramelized peanuts
es: Cacahuetes garrapiñados, Garrapiñadas de cacahuete, Cacahuetes confitados, Garrapiñadas de maní, Maní confitado, Cacahuetes caramelizados
fr: Cacahuètes caramélisées, arachides caramélisées, chouchous
hr: Karamelizirani kikiriki
hu: Karamellizált földimogyoró, Karamellizált mogyoró
lt: Karamelizuoti žemės reišutai
nl: Suikerpinda's, gesuikerde pinda's

en: Caramelized cashew nuts
fr: Noix de cajou caramélisées

en: Farming products, farm products
bg: Селскостопански продукти
ca: Productes agrícoles
de: Landwirtschaftliche Produkte
es: Productos agrícolas
fi: viljellyt tuotteet
fr: Produits d’élevages
hr: Poljoprivredni proizvodi
hu: Mezőgazdasági termékek
it: Prodotti agricoli
lt: Žemės ūkio produktai, ūkio produktai
nl: Fokproducten
pt: Produtos agrícolas
ru: Продукты сельскохозяйственного производства
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากฟาร์ม
tr: Çiftlik ürünleri
zh: 农产品

en: Honeys
bg: Мед
ca: Mel
da: Honning
de: Honige, Honig
es: Mieles, Miel
et: Medet, mesi
fi: hunajat
fr: Miels
he: סוגי דבש
hr: medovi, med
hu: Mézek
it: Miele
ja: 蜂蜜, はちみつ
lt: Medus
nl: Honingen
pl: Miody
pt: Méis
ru: Мёд
sv: Honung
th: น้ำผึ้ง
tr: Bal
zh: 蜂蜜

en: Honeys from Belgium, Belgian honeys
fr: Miels belges, Miels de Belgique
hr: Medovi iz belgije
lt: Medus iš Belgijos

en: Italian honeys
de: Italienische Honige
es: Mieles italianas
fr: Miels italiens
hr: Talijanski medovi
lt: Medus iš Italijos
nl: Italiaanse honing

en: Portuguese honeys
lt: Medus iš Portugalijos

en: Spanish honeys
lt: Medus iš Ispanijos

en: Honeys from France, French honeys
de: Honige aus Frankreich, Französische Honige
es: Miel de Francia, Miel francesa
fi: ranskalaiset hunajat
fr: Miels français, Miels de France
hr: Medovi iz Francuske
hu: Francia mézek, Mézek Franciaországból
it: Miele francese
lt: Medus iš Prancūzijos
nl: Franse honingen
pt: Méis de França
ru: Французский мед

en: Honeys from Alsace
es: Mieles de Alsacia
fr: Miels d’Alsace
hr: Medovi iz alzasa
nl: Honinge nuit de de Alsace

en: Acacia honeys from Alsace
fr: Miels d'acacia d'Alsace
hr: Bagremov med iz alzasa
nl: Acaciahoningen uit de Alsace

en: Acacia honeys from Jura
fr: Miels d’acacia du Jura
hr: Bagremovi medovi od jure
nl: Acaciahoningen uit de Jura

fr: Miels de châtaignier d'Alsace
nl: Kastanjehoningen uit de Alsace

fr: Miels de fleurs d'Alsace
nl: Bloemenhoningen uit de Alsace

fr: Miels de forêt d'Alsace
nl: Boshoningen uit de Alsace

fr: Miels de sapin d'Alsace
nl: Sparrenhoningen uit de Alsace

fr: Miels de tilleul d'Alsace
nl: Lindebloesemhoningen uit de Alsace

fr: Miels d'Aquitaine
nl: Honingen uit de Aquitaine